Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.210

Revision of corporate boundary within street, road, or highway right-of-way by substituting right-of-way line—Not subject to review.

(1) The governing bodies of a county and any code city located therein may by agreement revise any part of the corporate boundary of the city which coincides with the centerline, edge, or any portion of a public street, road or highway right-of-way by substituting therefor a right-of-way line of the same public street, road or highway so as fully to include or fully to exclude that segment of the public street, road or highway from the corporate limits of the city.

(2) The revision of a corporate boundary as authorized by this section shall become effective when approved by ordinance of the city council and by ordinance or resolution of the county legislative authority. Such a boundary revision is not subject to potential review by a boundary review board.

[ 1989 c 84 s 11; 1975 1st ex.s. c 220 s 18.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding, intent—1975 1st ex.s. c 220: See note following RCW 35.02.170.

Boundary line adjustment: RCW 35.13.300 through 35.13.330.

Use of right-of-way line as corporate boundary in incorporation proceeding—When right-of-way may be included in territory to be incorporated: RCW 35.02.170.

When right-of-way may be included in territory to be annexed—Use of right-of-way line as corporate boundary in annexation: RCW 35A.14.410.